Tennessee, session 114, HB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall conduct a study and prepare a report on recommendations on the continuum of
care in this state and how the continuum of care can be improved.
(b) The study and report must survey the continuum of care in other states and
compare such care to the continuum of care in this state. This study must be conducted
from TACIR's existing resources.
(c) All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to
TACIR in connection with the study required by subsection (a).
(d) On or before January 1, 2026, TACIR shall report its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to each member of the general
assembly and shall provide a copy to the legislative librarian. The report may be
delivered electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1192
003085
- 1 -